Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.410

Comprehensive plan—Amendment.

When changed conditions or further studies by the planning agency indicate a need, the commission may amend, extend or add to all or part of the comprehensive plan in the manner provided herein for approval in the first instance.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.410. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 41.]